Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-1927
Residential child-caring agency or
child-placing agency; license required; current license holders; how treated.

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a residential child-caring agency
or child-placing agency shall not be established, operated, or maintained
in this state without first obtaining a license issued by the department under
the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act. No person
shall hold itself out as a residential child-caring agency or child-placing
agency or as providing such services unless licensed under the act. The department
shall issue a license to a residential child-caring agency or a child-placing
agency that satisfies the requirements for licensing under the act.

(2) A group home,
child-caring agency, or child-placing agency licensed under sections 71-1901
to 71-1906.01 on May 26, 2013, shall be deemed licensed under the Children's
Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act until the license under such
sections expires, and renewal shall be under the act.

(3) For purposes of requiring
licensure, a residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency does
not include an individual licensed as a foster family home under sections
71-1901 to 71-1906.01, a person licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure
Act, a person operating a juvenile detention facility as defined in section
83-4,125, a staff secure youth confinement facility operated by a county,
or a person providing only casual care for children at irregular intervals.
Such persons may voluntarily apply for a license.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 4.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.